Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.260

Warrant of arrest.

If the governor decides that the demand should be complied with, he or she shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal, and be directed to any peace officer or other person whom he or she may think fit to entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1070; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 7.]